Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB176.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 121.180 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) 1. Persons becoming a candidate as defined in KRS 121.015(8) or slate of
candidates as defined in KRS 121.015(9), or a political issues committee
as defined in KRS 121.015(3)(d), shall submit a form prescribed and
furnished by the registry indicating whether they intend to raise or spend
in excess of five thousand dollars ($5,000) in any one (1) election, or
that contributions will not be accepted or expended in excess of five
thousand dollars ($5,000) in any one (1) election. Candidates and slates
of candidates shall submit this form to the registry within five (5) days
of receiving contributions or making expenditures with a view to
bringing about his or her nomination or election to public office, or
within five (5) days of filing papers to run for public office, whichever is
sooner. Candidates and slates of candidates who advance to a regular
election following a primary shall submit this form to the registry within
five (5) days after the date of the primary. Political issues committees
shall submit the form to the registry within five (5) days of meeting the
definition of political issues committee in KRS 121.015(3)(d).
2. Each candidate, slate of candidates, or political issues committee
indicating that contributions will not be accepted or expended in excess
of five thousand dollars ($5,000) in any one (1) election shall be exempt
from filing any campaign finance reports required by subsection (3) of
this section.
3. A separate form shall be required for each primary, regular, or special
election in which the candidate or slate of candidates participates or in
which the public question appears on the ballot. The form shall be
Page 1 of 17
XXXX 2/10/2026 10:49 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1861
submitted by means of electronic filing with the registry.
4. Any person acting as a candidate or slate of candidates by receiving
contributions or making expenditures with a view to bringing about his
or her nomination or election to public office, or filing papers to run for
public office, or group of persons acting as a political issues committee,
who fails to file this form as required, or who fails to remedy a
deficiency within five (5) days, may be fined by the registry an amount
not to exceed two hundred dollars ($200) per day, up to a maximum
total fine of five thousand dollars ($5,000).
(b) For a primary, a candidate or slate of candidates shall file a request for
exemption not later than the deadline described in paragraph (a) of this
subsection for filing nomination papers and, except as provided in
subparagraph 2. of paragraph (c) of this subsection, shall be bound by its
terms unless it is rescinded in writing not later than thirty (30) days preceding
the primary. For a regular election, a candidate or slate of candidates shall file
or rescind in writing a request for exemption not later than sixty (60) days
preceding the regular election, except as provided in subparagraph 2. of
paragraph (c) of this subsection. For a special election, a candidate or slate of
candidates shall file a request for exemption not later than ten (10) days after
the candidate or slate of candidates is nominated for a special election and
shall be bound by its terms unless it is rescinded in writing not later than thirty
(30) days preceding the special election. A political issues committee chair
shall file a request for exemption when the committee registers with the
registry and shall be bound by its terms unless it is rescinded in writing not
later than thirty (30) days preceding the date the issue appears on the ballot.
(c) 1. A candidate or slate of candidates that revokes a request for exemption
in a timely manner shall file all reports required of a candidate intending
Page 2 of 17
XXXX 2/10/2026 10:49 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1861
to raise or spend in excess of five thousand dollars ($5,000) in an
election. To revoke the request for an exemption, the candidate or slate
of candidates shall file the appropriate form with the registry not later
than the deadline for filing a revocation.
2. A candidate or slate of candidates that is exempted from campaign
finance reporting requirements pursuant to paragraph (a) of this
subsection but who accepts contributions or makes expenditures in
excess of the exempted amount in an election, shall file all applicable
reports required for the remainder of that election, based upon the
amount of contributions or expenditures the candidate or slate of
candidates accepts or receives in that election.
(d) Any candidate or slate of candidates that is subject to a June or August filing
deadline and that intends to execute a request for exemption shall file the
appropriate request for exemption not later than the deadline described in
paragraph (a) of this subsection and, except as provided in subparagraph 2. of
paragraph (c) of this subsection, shall be bound by its terms unless it is
rescinded in writing not later than sixty (60) days preceding the regular
election. A candidate or slate of candidates that is covered by this paragraph
shall have the same reversion rights as those provided in subparagraph 1. of
paragraph (c) of this subsection.
(e) Any candidate or slate of candidates that will appear on the ballot in a regular
election that has signed a request for exemption for that election may exercise
the reversion rights provided in subparagraph 1. of paragraph (c) of this
subsection if a candidate or slate of candidates that is subject to a June or
August filing deadline subsequently files in opposition to the candidate or
slate of candidates. Except as provided in subparagraph 2. of paragraph (c) of
this subsection, a candidate or slate of candidates covered by this paragraph
Page 3 of 17
XXXX 2/10/2026 10:49 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1861
shall comply with the deadline for rescission provided in subparagraph 1. of
paragraph (c) of this subsection.
(f) Except as provided in subparagraph 2. of paragraph (c) of this subsection, any
candidate or slate of candidates that has filed a request for exemption for a
regular election that later is opposed by a person who has filed a declaration
of intent to receive write-in votes may rescind the request for exemption and
exercise the reversion rights provided in subparagraph 1. of paragraph (c) of
this subsection.
(g) Any candidate or slate of candidates that has filed a request for exemption
may petition the registry to determine whether another person is campaigning
as a write-in candidate prior to having filed a declaration of intent to receive
write-in votes, and, if the registry determines upon a preponderance of the
evidence that a person who may later be a write-in candidate is conducting a
campaign, the candidate or slate of candidates, except as provided in
subparagraph 2. of paragraph (c) of this subsection, may petition the registry
to permit the candidate or slate of candidates to exercise the reversion rights
provided in subparagraph 1. of paragraph (c) of this subsection.
(h) If the opponent of a candidate or slate of candidates is replaced due to his or
her withdrawal because of death, disability, or disqualification, the candidate
or slate of candidates, except as provided in subparagraph 2. of paragraph (c)
of this subsection, may exercise the reversion rights provided in subparagraph
1. of paragraph (c) of this subsection not later than fifteen (15) days after the
party executive committee nominates a replacement for the withdrawn
candidate or slate of candidates.
(i) A person intending to be a write-in candidate for any office in a regular or
special election may execute a request for exemption under paragraph (a) of
this subsection and shall be bound by its terms unless it is rescinded in writing
Page 4 of 17
XXXX 2/10/2026 10:49 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1861
not later than fifteen (15) days preceding the regular or special election. A
person intending to be a write-in candidate who revokes a request for
exemption in a timely manner shall file all reports required of a candidate
intending to raise or spend in excess of five thousand dollars ($5,000) in an
election. Except as provided in subparagraph 2. of paragraph (c) of this
subsection, a person intending to be a write-in candidate who revokes a
request for exemption shall file the appropriate form with the registry.
(j) Except as provided in subparagraph 2. of paragraph (c) of this subsection, the
campaign committee of any candidate or slate of candidates that has filed a
request for exemption or a political issues committee whose chair has filed a
request for exemption shall be bound by its terms unless it is rescinded in a
timely manner.
(k) 1. Except as provided in subparagraph 2. of paragraph (c) of this
subsection, any candidate, slate of candidates, or political issues
committee that is exempt from filing campaign finance reports pursuant
to paragraph (a), (d), or (i) of this subsection that accepts contributions
or makes expenditures, or whose campaign treasurer accepts
contributions or makes expenditures, in excess of the applicable limit in
any one (1) election without rescinding the request for exemption in a
timely manner shall comply with all applicable reporting requirements
and, in lieu of other penalties prescribed by law, pay a fine of not less
than five hundred dollars ($500).
2. Except as provided in subparagraph 2. of paragraph (c) of this
subsection, a candidate, slate of candidates, campaign committee, or
political issues committee that is exempt from filing campaign finance
reports pursuant to paragraph (a), (d), or (i) of this subsection that
knowingly accepts contributions or makes expenditures in excess of the
Page 5 of 17
XXXX 2/10/2026 10:49 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1861
applicable spending limit in any one (1) election without rescinding the
request for exemption in a timely manner shall comply with all
applicable reporting requirements and shall be guilty of a Class D
felony.
(l) 1. Any candidate exempt from filing under this subsection for a primary
shall file a report described in subsection (4) of this section.
2. Any candidate exempt from filing under this subsection for a primary
who advances to the regular election shall file for an additional
exemption under this section for the regular election or the candidate
shall no longer be exempt from the filing requirements.
3. In the event a candidate exempt from filing under this subsection is no
longer eligible for the exemption, he or she shall immediately file for a
revocation of the exemption under paragraph (c) of this subsection.
(2) (a) State and county executive committees, and caucus campaign committees
shall make a full report, upon a prescribed form, to the registry, of all money,
loans, or other things of value, received from any source, and expenditures
authorized, incurred, or made, since the date of the last report, including:
1. For each contribution of any amount made by a permanent committee,
the name and business address of the permanent committee, the date of
the contribution, the amount contributed, and a description of the major
business, social, or political interest represented by the permanent
committee;
2. For other contributions in excess of one hundred dollars ($100), the full
name, address, age if less than the legal voting age, the date of the
contribution, the amount of the contribution, and the employer and
occupation of each contributor. If the contributor is self-employed, the
name under which he or she is doing business shall be listed;
Page 6 of 17
XXXX 2/10/2026 10:49 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1861
3. The total amount of cash contributions received during the reporting
period; and
4. A complete statement of expenditures authorized, incurred, or made.
The complete statement of expenditures shall include the name and
address of each person to whom an expenditure is made in excess of
twenty-five dollars ($25), and the amount, date, and purpose of each
expenditure.
(b) In addition to the reporting requirements in paragraph (a) of this subsection,
the state executive committee of a political party that has established a
building fund account under KRS 121.172 shall make a full report, upon a
prescribed form, to the registry, of all contributions received from any source,
and expenditures authorized, incurred, or made, since the date of the last
report for the separate building fund account, including:
1. For each contribution of any amount made by a corporation, the name
and business address of the corporation, the date of the contribution, the
amount contributed, and a description of the major business conducted
by the corporation;
2. For other contributions in excess of one hundred dollars ($100), the full
name and address of the contributor, the date of the contribution, the
amount of the contribution, and the employer and occupation of each
contributor. If the contributor is self-employed, the name under which
he or she is doing business shall be listed;
3. The total amount of cash contributions received during the reporting
period; and
4. A complete statement of expenditures authorized, incurred, or made.
The complete statement of expenditures shall include the name and
address of each person to whom an expenditure is made in excess of
Page 7 of 17
XXXX 2/10/2026 10:49 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1861
twenty-five dollars ($25), and the amount, date, and purpose of each
expenditure.
(c) The report required by paragraph (a) of this subsection shall be made on a
semiannual basis if the committee has more than ten thousand dollars
($10,000) in its campaign fund account, and shall be received by the registry
by January 31 and by July 31. The January report shall cover the period from
July 1 to December 31. The July report shall cover the period from January 1
to June 30. If the committee has less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) in its
campaign fund account the report required by paragraph (a) of this subsection
shall be made on an annual basis, and shall be received by the registry by
January 31. If an individual gives a reportable contribution to a caucus
campaign committee or to a state or county executive committee with the
intention that the contribution or a portion of the contribution go to a
candidate or slate of candidates, the name of the contributor and the sum shall
be indicated on the committee report. The report required by paragraph (b) of
this subsection relating to a state executive committee's building fund account
shall be received by the registry within two (2) business days after the close of
each calendar quarter. The receipts and expenditures of funds remitted to each
political party under KRS 141.071 to 141.073 shall be separately accounted
for and reported to the registry in the manner required by KRS 121.230. The
separate report may be made a separate section within the report required by
this subsection to be received by the registry by January 31.
(3) (a) Except for candidates or slates of candidates, campaign committees, or
political issues committees exempted from reporting requirements pursuant to
subsection (1) of this section, each campaign treasurer of a candidate, slate of
candidates, campaign committee, or political issues committee who accepts
contributions or expends, expects to accept contributions or expend, or
Page 8 of 17
XXXX 2/10/2026 10:49 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1861
contracts to expend more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) in any one (1)
election, and each fundraiser who secures contributions in excess of five
thousand dollars ($5,000) in any one (1) election, shall make a full report to
the registry, on a form provided or using a format approved by the registry, of
all money, loans, or other things of value, received from any source, and
expenditures authorized, incurred, and made, since the date of the last report,
including:
1. For each contribution of any amount made by a permanent committee,
the name and business address of the permanent committee, the date of
the contribution, the amount contributed, and a description of the major
business, social, or political interest represented by the permanent
committee;
2. For each contribution in excess of one hundred dollars ($100) made to
any candidate or campaign committee or a political issues committee,
the full name, address, age if less than the legal voting age, the date of
the contribution, the amount of the contribution, and the employer and
occupation of each other contributor. If the contributor is self-employed,
the name under which he or she is doing business shall be listed;
3. The total amount of cash contributions received during the reporting
period; and
4. A complete statement of all expenditures authorized, incurred, or made.
The complete statement of expenditures shall include the name, address,
and occupation of each person to whom an expenditure is made in
excess of twenty-five dollars ($25), and the amount, date, and purpose
of each expenditure.
(b) Reports of all candidates, slates of candidates, campaign committees,
independent expenditure-only committees, political issues committees, and
Page 9 of 17
XXXX 2/10/2026 10:49 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1861
registered fundraisers shall be made as follows:
1. a. Candidates seeking statewide office, slates of candidates,
campaign committees for candidates seeking statewide office and
for slates of candidates, independent expenditure-only committees,
political issues committees, and fundraisers which file the form
described in subsection (1)(a) of this section before the year of an
election in which the candidate, a slate of candidates, or public
question shall appear on the ballot, shall file financial reports with
the registry at the end of the first calendar quarter after persons
become statewide candidates or slates of candidates, or following
registration of the committee or fundraiser, and each calendar
quarter thereafter, ending with the last calendar quarter of that
year. The provisions of this subparagraph shall be retroactive to
January 1, 2021;
b. All other candidates and campaign committees shall file annual
financial reports to be received by the registry on or before
December 1 for each year that a candidate is not yet on the ballot
but has filed a form as described in subsection (1)(a) of this
section with the registry for a future-year election; and
c. Candidates, slate of candidates, or committees shall make all
reports required by subparagraphs 2. to 5. of this paragraph during
the year in which the election takes place;
2. All candidates, slates of candidates, campaign committees, independent
expenditure-only committees, political issues committees, and registered
fundraisers shall make reports on the sixtieth day preceding a regular
election, including all previous contributions and expenditures;
3. All candidates, slates of candidates, campaign committees, independent
Page 10 of 17
XXXX 2/10/2026 10:49 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1861
expenditure-only committees, political issues committees, and registered
fundraisers shall make reports on the thirtieth day preceding an election,
including all previous contributions and expenditures;
4. All candidates, slates of candidates, campaign committees, independent
expenditure-only committees, political issues committees, and registered
fundraisers shall make reports on the fifteenth day preceding the date of
the election; and
5. All reports to the registry shall cover campaign activity during the entire
reporting period and must be received by the registry within two (2)
business days after the date the reporting period ends to be deemed
timely filed.
(4) All candidates, regardless of funds received or expended, campaign committees,
independent expenditure-only committees, political issues committees, and
registered fundraisers shall make post-election reports within thirty (30) days after
the election. All post-election reports to the registry shall cover campaign activity
during the entire reporting period and must be received by the registry within two
(2) business days after the date the reporting period ends to be deemed timely filed.
For candidates, slates of candidates, and political issues committees otherwise
exempt under subsection (1)(a) of this section, the reporting period begins the day
the request for exemption is filed with the registry and continues through the
thirtieth day after the election.
(5) In making the preceding reports, the total gross receipts from each of the following
categories shall be listed: proceeds from the sale of tickets for events such as
testimonial affairs, dinners, luncheons, rallies, and similar fundraising events, mass
collections made at the events, and sales of items such as campaign pins, buttons,
hats, ties, literature, and similar materials. When any individual purchase or the
aggregate purchases of any item enumerated above from a candidate or slate of
Page 11 of 17
XXXX 2/10/2026 10:49 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1861
candidates for a statewide-elected state office or a campaign committee for a
candidate or slate of candidates for a statewide-elected state office exceeds one
hundred dollars ($100), the purchaser shall be identified by name, address, age, if
less than the legal voting age, occupation, and employer or, if the purchaser is self-
employed, the name under which he or she is doing business, and the amount of the
purchase. When any individual purchase or the aggregate purchases of any item
enumerated above from any candidate or campaign committee other than a
candidate or slate of candidates for a statewide-elected state office or campaign
committee for a candidate or slate of candidates for a statewide-elected state office
exceeds one hundred dollars ($100), the purchaser shall be identified by name,
address, age if less than the legal voting age, occupation, and employer or, if the
purchaser is self-employed, the name under which he or she is doing business, and
the amount of the purchase. The lists shall be maintained by the campaign treasurer,
political issues committee treasurer, registered fundraiser, or other sponsor for
inspection by the registry for six (6) years following the date of the election.
(6) Each permanent committee, except a federally registered political committee as
defined in 52 U.S.C. sec. 30101(4)(a), inaugural committee, or contributing
organization shall make a full report to the registry, on a form provided or using a
format approved by the registry, of all money, loans, or other things of value,
received by it from any source, and all expenditures authorized, incurred, or made,
since the date of the last report, including:
(a) For each contribution of any amount made by a permanent committee, the
name and business address of the permanent committee, the date of the
contribution, the amount contributed, and a description of the major business,
social, or political interest represented by the permanent committee;
(b) For other contributions in excess of one hundred dollars ($100), the full name,
address, age if under the legal voting age, the date of the contribution, the
Page 12 of 17
XXXX 2/10/2026 10:49 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1861
amount of the contribution, and the employer and occupation of each
contributor. If the contributor is self-employed, the name under which he or
she is doing business shall be listed;
(c) An aggregate amount of cash contributions, the amount contributed by each
contributor, and the date of each contribution; and
(d) A complete statement of all expenditures authorized, incurred, or made,
including independent expenditures. This report shall be made by a permanent
committee, inaugural committee, or contributing organization to the registry
on the last day of the first calendar quarter following the registration of the
committee with the registry and on the last day of each succeeding calendar
quarter until such time as the committee terminates. A contributing
organization shall file a report of contributions received and expenditures on a
form provided or using a format approved by the registry not later than the
last day of each calendar quarter in which contributions are received or
expenditures are made. All reports to the registry shall be received on or
before each filing deadline, and any report received by the registry within two
(2) business days after each filing deadline shall be deemed timely filed.
(7) If the final statement of a candidate, campaign committee, independent expenditure-
only committee, or political issues committee shows an unexpended balance of
contributions, continuing debts and obligations, or an expenditure deficit, the
campaign treasurer shall file with the registry a supplemental statement of
contributions and expenditures not more than thirty (30) days after the deadline for
filing the final statement. Subsequent supplemental statements shall be filed
annually, to be received by the registry by December 1 of each year, until the
account shows no unexpended balance, continuing debts and obligations,
expenditures, or deficit. All post-election reports to the registry shall cover
campaign activity during the entire reporting period and must be received by the
Page 13 of 17
XXXX 2/10/2026 10:49 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1861
registry within two (2) business days after the date the reporting period ends to be
deemed timely filed. All contributions shall be subject to KRS 121.150 as of the
date of the election in which the candidate appeared on the ballot.
(8) All reports filed under the provisions of this chapter shall be a matter of public
record open to inspection by any member of the public immediately upon receipt of
the report by the registry.
(9) A candidate or slate of candidates is relieved of the duty personally to file reports
and keep records of receipts and expenditures if the candidate or slate states in
writing or on forms provided by the registry that:
(a) Within five (5) business days after personally receiving any contributions, the
candidate or slate of candidates shall surrender possession of the contributions
to the treasurer of their campaign committee without expending any of the
proceeds thereof. No contributions shall be commingled with the candidate's
or slated candidates' personal funds or accounts. Contributions received by
check, money order, or other written instrument shall be endorsed directly to
the campaign committee and shall not be cashed or redeemed by the
candidate;
(b) The candidate or slate of candidates shall not make any unreimbursed
expenditure for the campaign, except that this paragraph does not preclude a
candidate or slate from making an expenditure from personal funds to the
designated campaign committee, which shall be reported by the committee as
a contribution received; and
(c) The waiver shall continue in effect as long as the candidate or slate of
candidates complies with the conditions under which it was granted.
(10) (a) No candidate, slate of candidates, campaign committee, independent
expenditure-only committee, political issues committee, or contributing
organization shall use or permit the use of contributions or funds solicited or
Page 14 of 17
XXXX 2/10/2026 10:49 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1861
received for the person or in support of or opposition to a public issue which
will appear on the ballot to:
1. Further the candidacy of the person for a different public office, except
that any member of the General Assembly who has a remaining
balance in his or her campaign account may elect to transfer those
funds to a campaign account to seek election to statewide
constitutional office;
2. Support or oppose a different public issue; or
3. Further the candidacy of any other person for public office.
(b) Nothing in this subsection shall be deemed to prohibit a candidate or slate of
candidates from using funds in a campaign account to contribute directly to
another candidate or slate of candidates for state or federal office, or to
purchase admission tickets for any fundraising event or testimonial affair for
another candidate or slate of candidates for state or federal office, if the
amount of the purchase or contribution does not exceed the individual
contribution limit contained in KRS 121.150(6) or 52 U.S.C. sec. 30116 in
any one (1) election.
(c) Any funds or contributions solicited or received by or on behalf of a
candidate, slate of candidates, or any committee, which has been organized in
whole or in part to further any candidacy for the same person or to support or
oppose the same public issue, shall be deemed to have been solicited or
received for the current candidacy or for the election on the public issue if the
funds or contributions are solicited or received at any time prior to the regular
election for which the candidate, slate of candidates, or public issue is on the
ballot.
(d) Any unexpended balance of funds not otherwise obligated for the payment of
expenses incurred to further a political issue or the candidacy of a person
Page 15 of 17
XXXX 2/10/2026 10:49 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1861
shall, in whole or in part, at the election of the candidate or committee:
1. Escheat to the State Treasury;
2. Be returned pro rata to all contributors;
3. In the case of a partisan candidate, be transferred to:
a. A caucus campaign committee; or
b. The state or county executive committee of the political party of
which the candidate is a member;
4. Be retained to further the same public issue or to seek election to the
same office, except that any member of the General Assembly who has
a remaining balance in his or her campaign account may elect to
transfer those funds to a campaign account to seek election to
statewide constitutional office; or
5. Be donated to any charitable, nonprofit, or educational institution
recognized under Section 501(c)(3) of the United States Internal
Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, and any successor thereto, from
which the candidate or committee receives no financial benefit.
(11) If adequate and appropriate agency funds are available to implement this
subsection, electronic reporting shall be made available by the registry to all
candidates, slates of candidates, committees, contributing organizations, registered
fundraisers, and persons making independent expenditures. The electronic report
submitted to the registry shall be the official campaign finance report for audit and
other legal purposes, whether mandated or filed by choice.
(12) The date that an electronic or on-line report shall be deemed to have been filed with
the registry shall be the date on which it is received by the registry.
(13) All electronic or online filers shall affirm, under penalty of perjury, that the report
filed with the registry is complete and accurate.
(14) Filers who submit electronic campaign finance reports which are not readable, or
Page 16 of 17
XXXX 2/10/2026 10:49 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1861
cannot be copied shall be deemed to not be in compliance with the requirements set
forth in this section.
(15) Beginning with the primary scheduled in calendar year 2020, and for each
subsequent election scheduled thereafter, reports required to be submitted to the
registry involving candidates, slates of candidates, committees, contributing
organizations, and independent expenditures shall be reported electronically.
(16) (a) On each form that the registry supplies for the reports required under
subsections (2), (3), and (6) of this section, the registry shall include an entry
reading, "No change since last report."
(b) If a person or entity that is required to report under subsection (2), (3), or (6)
of this section has received no money, loans, or other things of value from any
source since the date of its last report and has not authorized, incurred, or
made any expenditures since that date, the person or entity may check or
otherwise designate the entry that reads, "No change since last report." A
person or entity designating this entry in a report shall state the balance
carried forward from the last report but need not specify receipts or
expenditures in further detail.
Page 17 of 17
XXXX 2/10/2026 10:49 AM Jacketed